Utah statutes.
51-2a-201.   Accounting reports required.

(1)  The governing board of an entity whose revenues or expenditures of all funds is $500,000 or more shall cause an audit to be made of its accounts by a competent certified public accountant.

(2)  The governing board of an entity whose revenues or expenditures of all funds is less than $500,000 shall cause a financial report to be made in the manner prescribed by the state auditor.



Amended by Chapter 162, 2013 General Session

